assets/javascript/tinymce/plugins/spellchecker/dicts/es_ES.aff
SFX R Y 197
SFX R r mos [aei]r
SFX R ar is ar
SFX R r ba ar
SFX R r bas ar
SFX R ar bamos ar
SFX R ar abais ar
SFX R r ban ar
SFX R ar  [^cguz]ar
SFX R car qu car
SFX R ar u gar
SFX R ar  [^g]uar
SFX R uar  guar
SFX R zar c zar
SFX R r ste ar
SFX R ar  ar
SFX R r steis ar
SFX R r ron ar
SFX R 0  [aei]r
SFX R 0 s [aei]r
SFX R 0  [aei]r
SFX R 0 emos [aei]r
SFX R 0 is [aei]r
SFX R 0 n [aei]r
SFX R 0 a [aei]r
SFX R 0 as [aei]r
SFX R 0 amos [aei]r
SFX R 0 ais [aei]r
SFX R 0 an [aei]r
SFX R ar emos [^cguz]ar
SFX R car quemos car
SFX R ar uemos gar
SFX R ar emos [^g]uar
SFX R uar emos guar
SFX R zar cemos zar
SFX R ar is [^cguz]ar
SFX R car quis car
SFX R ar uis gar
SFX R ar is [^g]uar
SFX R uar is guar
SFX R zar cis zar
SFX R 0 a ar
SFX R r se ar
SFX R 0 as ar
SFX R r ses ar
SFX R ar ramos ar
SFX R ar semos ar
SFX R 0 ais ar
SFX R r seis ar
SFX R 0 an ar
SFX R r sen ar
SFX R 0 e ar
SFX R 0 es ar
SFX R ar remos ar
SFX R 0 eis ar
SFX R 0 en ar
SFX R r d [aei]r
SFX R r ndo ar
SFX R ar ndose ar
SFX R 0 se [aei]r
SFX R er is er
SFX R er a er
SFX R er as er
SFX R er amos er
SFX R er ais er
SFX R er an er
SFX R er  er
SFX R er iste [^aeo]er
SFX R er ste [aeo]er
SFX R er i [^aeo]er
SFX R er y [aeo]er
SFX R er imos [^aeo]er
SFX R er mos [aeo]er
SFX R er isteis [^aeo]er
SFX R er steis [aeo]er
SFX R er ieron [^aeo]er
SFX R er yeron [aeo]er
SFX R er iera [^aeo]er
SFX R er yera [aeo]er
SFX R er iese [^aeo]er
SFX R er yese [aeo]er
SFX R er ieras [^aeo]er
SFX R er yeras [aeo]er
SFX R er ieses [^aeo]er
SFX R er yeses [aeo]er
SFX R er iramos [^aeo]er
SFX R er yramos [aeo]er
SFX R er isemos [^aeo]er
SFX R er ysemos [aeo]er
SFX R er ierais [^aeo]er
SFX R er yerais [aeo]er
SFX R er ieseis [^aeo]er
SFX R er yeseis [aeo]er
SFX R er ieran [^aeo]er
SFX R er yeran [aeo]er
SFX R er iesen [^aeo]er
SFX R er yesen [aeo]er
SFX R er iere [^aeo]er
SFX R er yere [aeo]er
SFX R er ieres [^aeo]er
SFX R er yeres [aeo]er
SFX R er iremos [^aeo]er
SFX R er yremos [aeo]er
SFX R er iereis [^aeo]er
SFX R er yereis [aeo]er
SFX R er ieren [^aeo]er
SFX R er yeren [aeo]er
SFX R er iendo [^aeo]er
SFX R er indose [^aeo]er
SFX R er yendo [aeo]er
SFX R er yndose [aeo]er
SFX R r ndo er
SFX R er ndose er
SFX R ir s ir
SFX R ir a ir
SFX R ir as ir
SFX R ir amos ir
SFX R ir ais ir
SFX R ir an ir
SFX R ir  ir
SFX R r ste ir
SFX R r  [^l]ir
SFX R r  [^l]lir
SFX R ir  llir
SFX R ir  ir
SFX R r steis ir
SFX R r eron [^l]ir
SFX R r eron [^l]lir
SFX R ir eron llir
SFX R ir eron ir
SFX R r era [^l]ir
SFX R r era [^l]lir
SFX R ir era llir
SFX R ir era ir
SFX R r ese [^l]ir
SFX R r ese [^l]lir
SFX R ir ese llir
SFX R ir ese ir
SFX R r eras [^l]ir
SFX R r eras [^l]lir
SFX R ir eras llir
SFX R ir eras ir
SFX R r eses [^l]ir
SFX R r eses [^l]lir
SFX R ir eses llir
SFX R ir eses ir
SFX R r ramos [^l]ir
SFX R r ramos [^l]lir
SFX R ir ramos llir
SFX R ir ramos ir
SFX R r semos [^l]ir
SFX R r semos [^l]lir
SFX R ir semos llir
SFX R ir semos ir
SFX R r erais [^l]ir
SFX R r erais [^l]lir
SFX R ir erais llir
SFX R ir erais ir
SFX R r eseis [^l]ir
SFX R r eseis [^l]lir
SFX R ir eseis llir
SFX R ir eseis ir
SFX R r eran [^l]ir
SFX R r eran [^l]lir
SFX R ir eran llir
SFX R ir eran ir
SFX R r esen [^l]ir
SFX R r esen [^l]lir
SFX R ir esen llir
SFX R ir esen ir
SFX R r ere [^l]ir
SFX R r ere [^l]lir
SFX R ir ere llir
SFX R ir ere ir
SFX R r eres [^l]ir
SFX R r eres [^l]lir
SFX R ir eres llir
SFX R ir eres ir
SFX R r remos [^l]ir
SFX R r remos [^l]lir
SFX R ir remos llir
SFX R ir remos ir
SFX R r ereis [^l]ir
SFX R r ereis [^l]lir
SFX R ir ereis llir
SFX R ir ereis ir
SFX R r eren [^l]ir
SFX R r eren [^l]lir
SFX R ir eren llir
SFX R ir eren ir
SFX R r endo [^l]ir
SFX R r ndose [^l]ir
SFX R r endo [^l]lir
SFX R r ndose [^l]lir
SFX R ir endo llir
SFX R ir ndose llir
SFX R ir endo ir
SFX R ir ndose ir

SFX E Y 73
SFX E ar o ar
SFX E r s [ae]r
SFX E r 0 [ae]r
SFX E r n [ae]r
SFX E ar e [^cguz]ar
SFX E car que car
SFX E ar ue gar
SFX E ar e [^g]uar
SFX E uar e guar
SFX E zar ce zar
SFX E ar es [^cguz]ar
SFX E car ques car
SFX E gar gues gar
SFX E ar es [^g]uar
SFX E uar es guar
SFX E zar ces zar
SFX E ar en [^cguz]ar
SFX E car quen car
SFX E gar guen gar
SFX E ar en [^g]uar
SFX E uar en guar
SFX E zar cen zar
SFX E er o [^cg]er
SFX E cer zo cer
SFX E ger jo ger
SFX E er a [^cg]er
SFX E cer za cer
SFX E ger ja ger
SFX E er as [^cg]er
SFX E cer zas cer
SFX E ger jas ger
SFX E er amos [^cg]er
SFX E cer zamos cer
SFX E ger jamos ger
SFX E er is [^cg]er
SFX E cer zis cer
SFX E ger jis ger
SFX E er an [^cg]er
SFX E cer zan cer
SFX E ger jan ger
SFX E ir o [^cgu]ir
SFX E cir zo cir
SFX E gir jo gir
SFX E uir o guir
SFX E quir co quir
SFX E ir es ir
SFX E ir e ir
SFX E ir en ir
SFX E ir a [^cgu]ir
SFX E cir za cir
SFX E gir ja gir
SFX E uir a guir
SFX E quir ca quir
SFX E ir as [^cgu]ir
SFX E cir zas cir
SFX E gir jas gir
SFX E uir as guir
SFX E quir cas quir
SFX E ir amos [^cgu]ir
SFX E cir zamos cir
SFX E gir jamos gir
SFX E uir amos guir
SFX E quir camos quir
SFX E ir is [^cgu]ir
SFX E cir zis cir
SFX E gir jis gir
SFX E uir is guir
SFX E quir cis quir
SFX E ir an [^cgu]ir
SFX E cir zan cir
SFX E gir jan gir
SFX E uir an guir
SFX E quir can quir
