assets/javascript/tinymce/plugins/spellchecker/dicts/es_ES.dic
abarbetar/RED
abarcuzar/RED
abisagrar/RED
ablandar/RPDE
abombar/PRED
aborrajar/RDE
abotonar/RhDE
abribonar/DRE
abroncar/DRE
abundar/rRtED
aburrir/RPD
acaldar/RDE
acalorar/RhDE
acardenalar/RED
acariciar/RDE
aceitar/hRiED
acelerar/RDEPA
achancar/RDE
achaparrar/ERD
acinturar/RED
aclarar/READ
acojonar/RED
acollarar/RED
acornar/RID
acorullar/RDE
acromatizar/RED
acuchillar/RED
acurrullar/RED
adecuar/ERDA
aderezar/hRDE
admitir/pERD
adocilar/RED
adscribir/ER
adstringir/RED
aerotransportar/RDE
afascalar/RED
afinar/hRD
afofar/RED
afrancesar/RDEP
agardamar/RED
agazapar/RED
agolar/RED
agraciar/hRDE
aguachar/RiED
aguachinar/RDE
aherrojar/hRDE
ahervorar/RED
ahuecar/REDP
airear/READ
ajuarar/RDE
alagar/RhDE
albear/RED
alcahuetear/RDE
alcatifar/RED
alegamar/RED
alelar/ERDP
alforrochar/RED
alhajar/RDhE
allanar/RPED
allegar/RP
almonedar/RDE
almonedear/RDE
altercar/REDA
alternar/sRED
amainar/RDE
amajanar/RDE
amarar/RD
amartelar/RhDE
amelar/R
amigar/hRED
amohosar/RED
amorillar/RDE
amorrar/RhED
amprar/RDE
amular/RED
anastomosar/RED
andar/EDSPB
angostar/RiED
anihilar/RPED
anonadar/ARPDE
anudar/hRpED
aadir/rRED
apaciguar/DREP
apalancar/RED
apasionar/hRDE
apeonar/RDE
apergaminar/RDE
apiojar/RED
apitonar/RPDE
apoderar/hRDPE
apomazar/RDE
apostillar/RED
apresar/REPD
apropincuar/DRE
apuear/RED
arabizar/RED
arcillar/RDE
arelar/RED
armar/RDBE
armonizar/RED
arrancar/RBPED
arranciar/RDE
arrecifar/RDE
arredondear/RED
arrepasar/RDE
arrepistar/ERD
arrodear/RDPE
arroyar/RDE
artillar/RhED
asaborar/RDE
aseverar/RDEA
asibilar/RDE
asonantar/RDE
aspear/ERD
astriir/ERD
asurar/RDE
ataluzar/RED
atarrajar/RED
atentar/hRD
atetillar/RDE
atinar/RhED
atollar/RhDE
atontar/RhDE
atrampar/hRDE
atrasar/RDPE
aturdir/RhED
atusar/RED
auxiliar/RED
avalar/RDE
avilantar/ERD
axiomatizar/RDE
azoar/RDE
bachear/RDE
badulaquear/RED
baldar/RPBED
bandear/RED
baquear/RDE
barcinar/RDE
basquear/RED
bastar/iRhaDE
batucar/RED
berrear/RDE
bestializar/ERD
biselar/aRDE
bobear/RDE
bollar/aRBED
borrar/iRhDE
brescar/RED
brujir/DRE
buzar/ERaD
cabriolear/RDE
cacarear/RDE
calafetear/RDE
calentar/RpDPI
callear/RDE
campanillear/RDE
candar/RDE
cantaletear/RED
capitalizar/RhDE
captar/READ
caratular/RiDE
carmenar/RED
carpir/RED
cascabelear/RED
caucionar/RDnE
cautivar/RDE
cecinar/aRED
centellar/RED
centralizar/RhDE
cernear/RED
chamarilear/RDE
chaparrear/RDE
charranear/RED
chicolear/RDE
chismar/RED
chorizar/RDE
churritar/RDE
cintar/RinED
civilizar/REDA
clamar/gRaoEpD
clorurar/ERD
cocear/DRaE
coger/RpEaLD
colmatar/RDE
colorar/gRDhE
comercializar/DRAE
compartimentar/RED
comprender/REQD
conceptuar/RDI
concretar/RED
confrontar/RAED
congelar/RPDAE
considerar/ARDE
contabilizar/RAED
contentar/PhDRE
contramatar/RDE
contrapuntear/RDE
contusionar/RDE
coquizar/RDE
corcovear/RDE
correntiar/RDE
costear/RDE
costumbrar/aRED
crinar/RDE
croscitar/RED
crujir/pRDE
cubiletear/RED
culminar/RDEA
culturizar/RED
custrir/RDE
debrocar/RE
deificar/READ
delirar/RE
derribar/RED
derrubiar/RED
desaquellar/RED
desbrazar/RE
descarrillar/RBED
descepar/RED
descoritar/RED
descular/RDE
desencorvar/R
desganchar/RDE
desgaritar/RDE
desinformar/RE
deslizar/REPD
desmenuzar/RPDE
despachar/RDE
despampanar/BRED
despezuar/RDE
despilfarrar/RDE
destapar/R
destronar/EP
desvolver/R
diagnosticar/RED
dietar/aRED
dinamitar/RED
discantar/RED
disidir/RDE
disonar/RID
dogmatizar/RDE
domar/RDEB
ecualizar/READ
edificar/hRED
eludir/ERD
embazar/REBD
emberrinchar/RDE
emborrizar/RED
embriagar/hRED
emburujar/RED
empandillar/RDE
emparedar/REDP
emperezar/REhD
empigelar/RDE
enalbar/RED
enamoricar/RED
encalostrar/RED
encanalar/RE
encapotar/hDRB
encartar/RAEDP
enceguecer/RLID
enchicar/DRE
enclavar/hRD
encordonar/RDE
encorozar/RED
enderechar/ERD
endosar/RED
enflaquecer/PRLDI
engalanar/RDE
engarbullar/RDE
engominar/RDE
engorrar/RED
engurruir/RD
enhebrar/RhED
enjuncar/RDE
enlechar/RDE
enmalecer/RLID
enralecer/RILD
enredar/hRDE
ensamblar/hRDE
ensobear/RDE
entabacar/RDE
entongar/RDE
entronizar/hRED
entubar/RED
envidiar/ERD
enzainar/RDE
erisipelar/RDE
esbrencar/RDE
escalfecer/RIDL
escantillar/gRED
escarear/RED
esclafar/RED
escolarizar/ARDE
escrutar/RDE
esculcar/RED
esmerilar/RDE
espachurrar/REgD
espeluznar/RgED
espernancar/RgDE
espurrir/RED
esquejar/gRDE
estatuar/RDE
estenografiar/RID
estrechar/RDPE
estregar/RBIEDP
evanescer/RED
evidenciar/RED
exhalar/ARDE
exiliar/RDE
exprimir/RDE
exterminar/ERD
fabular/RDfAE
faldear/RDE
fechar/RDE
ferrificar/RDE
filosofar/RED
fisionar/RED
florecer/hRipDLI
forestar/RgDhpE
fosilizar/RDE
frenetizar/RDE
frivolizar/RED
fusionar/RDE
gallardear/RDE
garfear/ERD
garramar/RED
gestionar/RfDE
globalizar/RDE
grabar/RAEDB
grajear/RED
guadaar/RDE
gualdrapear/RDE
hablar/RDE
hachear/RED
henificar/RED
hermetizar/RDE
hinchir/RD
hociquear/RED
honorificar/RDE
humear/RED
husmar/RDE
implementar/RED
impostar/RED
indagar/READ
indemnizar/RDEA
infringir/RED
ingresar/RDE
institucionalizar/RDE
integrar/hRApDE
invernar/hRED
ionizar/RAED
jalear/RDE
jarabear/RED
joder/ERD
jubilar/RAED
ladear/RDE
laicizar/RDE
largar/REaD
latir/EROD
levantar/RDEP
librear/RDE
listonar/iRDE
lleudar/RED
lubrificar/RDE
machetear/aRDE
magostar/ERD
malinterpretar/RDE
maltratar/RDPE
manear/RhDaE
manosear/RED
marcir/ERD
mariscar/RDE
matear/RDE
maullar/RID
melindrizar/RDE
mendigar/ERD
metodizar/RDE
mezquinar/RED
misturar/RED
mitificar/hRED
molliznear/RDE
molturar/RDE
moscardear/ERD
mosconear/RED
muquir/RDE
murmurar/REDA
negrear/pRED
neviscar/RED
nublar/aRED
obrar/RpDE
oficiar/RDE
olorizar/RED
optimizar/RED
ornear/RED
ovillar/RDhE
palear/RaDE
palpitar/REDA
paramentar/EiRD
parear/REaD
pastelear/RED
patentizar/RED
peguntar/iRED
pellizcar/RDE
peregrinar/READ
perforar/RAED
perturbar/RDAE
pintarrajar/RED
pintar/RED
planchar/hRaDE
plantar/kRpEDh
politiquear/RED
pompear/RED
postular/RED
prebendar/RDE
prescribir/RD
pretextar/RDE
profazar/RDE
propalar/RE
protocolar/RED
pulsear/RDE
pupar/RED
quilatar/hRaDE
rabear/RDE
ralear/RDE
rapar/gRDE
rasurar/RDE
realegrar/RE
recaudar/RAPE
recechar/RED
redar/iRED
reencuadernar/RDE
refractar/RED
regletear/RED
regular/dRDE
remarcar/R
remembrar/RE
repantigar/RED
replicar/RDE
resarcir/RDPE
respetar/RDE
resquebrajar/RDBPE
retrechar/RDE
retrogradar/RED
riscar/hRiagED
roborar/RfDE
ronquear/RDE
roturar/RED
ruar/aRED
sachar/RDBE
saldar/RDE
salsear/RDE
santiguar/REPD
secularizar/RDE
senderar/RED
serviciar/RED
silabar/ERD
singularizar/RED
soasar/RED
socializar/ERD
solar/kRDgsarf
sombrar/aRED
sondear/RED
sorrapar/RDE
sosegar/IRD
sufragar/RED
sugestionar/RDE
tabalear/RaDE
tabicar/RDE
taperujar/RED
tapizar/REiD
telefonear/RDE
tesar/iaREpD
tetar/aREhD
titubear/RDE
toar/RaDE
trabajar/aRED
trafulcar/RDE
transvasar/RDE
trasconejar/RDE
trasmontar/R
trastear/RED
trasverter/RDIL
tricotar/RDE
triptongar/RDE
trozar/hRDE
trullar/RDE
undular/RED
unimismar/RED
valorear/RDE
ventar/aRkpDh
ventiscar/RED
vigiar/RID
viltrotear/RED
volatizar/RDE
voltejear/RDE
zallar/RDE
zancajear/RED
zocatear/RDE
zumbar/RDE
